Missouri, session 2026, HB3232.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 1.520, to read as follows:
1.520. Any electrical corporation, as such term is defined in section 386.020, with
2 more than twenty-five percent ownership by a foreign entity shall divest of such
3 ownership or cease operations in this state before December 31, 2041. The attorney
4 general may enforce the provisions of this section.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.